Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 30 Mandamus

Cross references. —

As to actions by or against the state generally, see chapter 35 of this title.

As to application for writ of mandamus, see Rule 3, Sup. Ct.

Cited

in

State ex rel. Wyo. Ass'n of Consulting Eng'rs & Land Surveyors v. Sullivan, 798 P.2d 826,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 1990).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

52 Am. Jur. 2d Mandamus § 1 et seq.

Availability of mandamus to review order of reference to master or auditor, 76 ALR2d 1120.

Mandamus to compel ascertainment of compensation for property taken or injuries inflicted under power of eminent domain, 91 ALR2d 991.

Summary judgment in mandamus cases, 3 ALR3d 675.

Judgment granting or denying writ of mandamus as res judicata, 21 ALR3d 206.

Mandamus to compel disciplinary investigation or action against physician or attorney, 33 ALR3d 1429.

Mandamus, under 28 USC § 1361, to obtain change in prison condition or release of federal prisoner, 114 ALR Fed 225.

55 C.J.S. Mandamus § 1 et seq.

§ 1-30-101.
“Mandamus” defined.

Mandamus is a writ issued
in the name of the state to an inferior tribunal, a corporation, board
or person commanding the performance of an act which the law specially
enjoins as a duty resulting from an office, trust or station.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 725; R.S. 1887, § 3073; R.S. 1899, § 4194; C.S. 1910, § 5054; C.S. 1920, § 6316; R.S. 1931, § 89-4501; C.S. 1945, § 3-6701; W.S. 1957, § 1-877; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-31-101

.

Subject matter jurisdiction.—

Subject matter jurisdiction existed because a movant's request that a court order a coroner to provide a more detailed verdict and case docket fell under the definition of mandamus. The fact that the movant did not caption the action as a mandamus was not fatal to the movant's claim. Williams v. Sundstrom, 2016 WY 122, 385 P.3d 789,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 2016).

Supreme court jurisdiction. —

Under this section and art. 5, § 3, Wyo. Const., supreme court has jurisdiction to issue mandamus to compel governor to perform a ministerial duty. State ex rel. Irvine v. Brooks, 14 Wyo. 393, 84 P. 488,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1906).

Function of mandamus is to command performance

of a ministerial duty which is plainly defined and required by law. Williams v. Stafford, 589 P.2d 322,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 342

(Wyo. 1979), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998); State ex rel. Feeney v. District Court, 607 P.2d 1259,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 247

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 614 P.2d 710,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 259

(Wyo. 1980).

Thus, mandamus will not intervene to control minor court judge's discretion.

State ex rel. Feeney v. District Court, 614 P.2d 710,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 259

(Wyo. 1980).

Failure to exhaust administrative remedies forecloses mandamus.
—

Failure to pursue administrative relief and exhaust administrative remedies in accordance with a zoning ordinance forecloses the remedy of mandamus. State ex rel. Epp v. Mayor, 894 P.2d 590,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo. 1995).

Power to issue mandamus when writ of prohibition improperly
requested. —

The supreme court has the power to grant proper relief, in the form of mandamus, when a party improperly requests a writ of prohibition without objection, providing the party has shown a clear entitlement to such relief. Williams v. Stafford, 589 P.2d 322,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 342

(Wyo. 1979), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Necessary parties. —

Lessee is a necessary party in mandamus proceedings to compel board of land commissioners to cancel a lease of school lands. State ex rel. Marsh v. State Land Comm'rs, 7 Wyo. 478, 53 P. 292,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1898).

Receipt by treasurer. —

Under payment of taxes, mandamus will issue to compel treasurer to issue a receipt in full. Lobban v. State, 9 Wyo. 377, 64 P. 82,

1901 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1901).

County attorney. —

Because statutes with respect to the specific duties of a county attorney in emergency detention and involuntary hospitalization proceedings are ambiguous, the district court did not err in denying appellants' petition for a writ of mandamus directing the county attorney to commence court proceedings and to appear at initial emergency detention hearings as well as to appear and present the case in chief. State ex rel. W. Park Hosp. Dist. v. Skoric, 2014 WY 41, 321 P.3d 334,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 2014).

Mandamus to deposit protested taxes. —

County treasurer did not have authority to unilaterally determine that escrowed funds paid by taxpayer under protest were in excess of amount under appeal, and treasurer was therefore ordered to deposit protested taxes in an interest-bearing escrow account. Basin Elec. Power Coop. v. Bowen, 979 P.2d 503,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1999).

Mandamus to sign warrant. —

A petition for mandamus to compel the chairman of the board of county commissioners to sign a warrant, which states that the board allowed petitioner's claim and ordered it paid, and that clerk drew warrant therefor, is not demurrable for failure to state that there were funds in the treasury to pay the same, and that an itemized statement of the claim was filed, since former section, forbidding issue of demand warrants unless there are funds on hand to pay the same, and art. 16, § 7, Wyo. Const., prohibiting the audit, allowance or payment of claims unless a sworn itemized statement be filed, apply to the drawing of the warrants in the first instance, and on demurrer it will be presumed that officers did not violate the law. Appel v. State, 9 Wyo. 187, 61 P. 1015,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1900).

Mandamus of corporate officers. —

Where officers of a corporation have custody of books and records and deny stockholders access thereto, mandamus is proper remedy. Wyoming Coal Mining Co. v. State ex rel Kennedy, 15 Wyo. 97, 87 P. 337,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 15 Wyo. 97, 87 P. 984,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1906).

Livestock board secretary. —

Mandamus will not lie to compel secretary of state board of livestock commissioners (now Wyoming livestock board) to pay proceeds from a sale of estrays to a claimant unless secretary abuses his discretion, and refuses to consider proofs presented to him. State ex rel. Foote v. Board of Live-Stock Comm'rs, 4 Wyo. 126, 32 P. 114,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1893).

Auditor subject to mandamus. —

In proper cases state auditor is subject to the writ of mandamus under art. 5, § 3, Wyo. Const., this section and §

1-30-104

, where there is no adequate remedy at law. State ex rel. Jeffrey v. Burdick, 3 Wyo. 588, 28 P. 146,

1891 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1891).

Mandamus to compel repair of highways. —

Mandamus is recognized as a proper remedy to compel public officers to take care of and keep in repair public highways only when the exercise is so apparent and obvious that the refusal to act is the result of a determination not to discharge a plain duty. Board of County Comm'rs v. State, 369 P.2d 537,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 1962).

Risk
manager's duty was not clear and certain. —

Trial court did not abuse its discretion in declining to issue a writ of mandamus where the notice of the employee's claim sought payments denied under the State Employees'
and Officials'
Group Plan (Group Plan), the risk manager's duty was not clear and certain, and had the risk manager investigated the claim as required she likely would have denied it on the ground that the employee had not exhausted the Group Plan appeals process.
State ex rel. Arnold v. Ommen, 2009 WY 24, 201 P.3d 1127,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2009).

Tax shortfall grants. —

Mandamus was not the proper remedy for determining whether tax shortfall grants authorized for school districts were required by statute to be included as local resources in the year in which they were paid; the districts were not entitled to the writ without a showing they had no plain and adequate remedy at law, and there was no such showing. State ex rel. Sweetwater County Sch. Dist. No. One v. Ohman, 895 P.2d 49,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 1995).

Applied

in

State ex rel. Wilkerson v. State Bd. of Equalization, 490 P.2d 1258,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1971).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Wyoming Agric. College v. Irvine, 14 Wyo. 318, 84 P. 90,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1906).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Supreme Court Jurisdiction and the Wyoming Constitution: Justice v. Judicial Restraint,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 159 (1985).

§ 1-30-102.
By what courts issued; cannot control judicial discretion.

The writ can only be
issued by the supreme court or the district court. It may require
an inferior tribunal to exercise its judgment or to proceed to discharge
any of its functions but it cannot control judicial discretion.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 726; R.S. 1887, § 3074; R.S. 1899, § 4195; C.S. 1910, § 5055; C.S. 1920, § 6317; R.S. 1931, § 89-4502; C.S. 1945, § 3-6702; W.S. 1957, § 1-878; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-31-102

.

Cross references. —

For another provision giving jurisdiction to supreme court and district courts, see art. 5, § 3, Wyo. Const.

Who may issue writ. —

The writ can only be issued by the supreme court or a district court. State ex rel. Jeffrey v. Burdick, 3 Wyo. 588, 28 P. 146,

1891 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1891).

Discretion of district court. —

Under this section the supreme court cannot control exercise of judicial discretion by the district court and judge. State ex rel. Murphy v. District Court, 38 Wyo. 382, 267 P. 424,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1928).

Mandamus cannot be utilized to test abuse of discretion of lower court

judicial officer. State ex rel. Feeney v. District Court, 614 P.2d 710,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 259

(Wyo. 1980).

Mandamus is not the proper method to challenge the action of a judicial officer in excluding the news media from a pretrial hearing, assuming that the decision to exclude the media was the result of the exercise of the judicial officer's discretion. State ex rel. Feeney v. District Court, 607 P.2d 1259,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 247

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 614 P.2d 710,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 259

(Wyo. 1980).

Letting state leases. —

Letting of leases on state lands by board of land commissioners involves exercise of judicial discretion and cannot be controlled by mandamus. State ex rel. Marsh v. State Land Comm'rs, 7 Wyo. 478, 53 P. 292,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1898).

Secretary of state. —

A writ of mandamus to compel secretary of state to affix state seal to and countersign a commission issued by the governor to one appointed by him to office, will not be denied because the commission would confer on person appointed no actual right, and therefore the writ would require the secretary to do a useless thing. State ex rel. Miller v. Barber, 4 Wyo. 409, 34 P. 1028,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1893).

Stated

in

Williams v. Stafford, 589 P.2d 322,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 342

(Wyo. 1979).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Supreme Court Jurisdiction and the Wyoming Constitution: Justice v. Judicial Restraint,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 159 (1985).

§ 1-30-103.
Application for writ; notice to defendant.

The application for a
writ must be by petition, in the name of the state, on the relation
of the party applying and verified by affidavit. The court may require
notice of the application to be given to the defendant, may grant
an order to show cause why it should not be allowed, or may allow
the writ without notice.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 727; R.S. 1887, § 3075; R.S. 1899, § 4196; C.S. 1910, § 5056; C.S. 1920, § 6318; R.S. 1931, § 89-4503; C.S. 1945, § 3-6703; W.S. 1957, § 1-879; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-31-103

.

Constitutionality of allowing writ without notice. —

Where statutory authority is given therefor, the peremptory writ of mandamus may be granted without notice or opportunity to defend and still not violate due process provisions of either state or federal constitutions, in cases where the writ is asked against public officers, as distinguished from cases where the writ is to require performance of private or personal duty affecting property rights. State ex rel. Blonder v. Goodbrod, 77 Wyo. 126, 307 P.2d 1073,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1957).

Section leaves to the discretion of the court the matter of dispensing with notice.

Where that discretion has been exercised the supreme court will not ordinarily interfere unless there is patent abuse. But, if it be found that the court has misapprehended the applicable law which robs the court of authority to grant the particular relief afforded, then the supreme court will rectify the error. State ex rel. Blonder v. Goodbrod, 77 Wyo. 126, 307 P.2d 1073,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1957).

But court is not given carte blanche to dispense with notice
at will and for slight reason. —

The supreme court will not assume that with the enactment of this section the legislature intended to give courts carte blanche to dispense with notice at will and for slight reason. It is more reasonable to ascribe to the lawmakers the limited purpose of making it possible to compel action in this summary fashion only in the clearest of cases where it is practically impossible to conceive of there being any valid excuse for non-performance of duty and where delay may result in defeat of right. State ex rel. Blonder v. Goodbrod, 77 Wyo. 126, 307 P.2d 1073,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1957).

Liability of off-duty police officer. —

Plaintiff in wrongful death action may prevail only if plaintiff has alleged sufficient facts to establish that off-duty police officer was acting within his scope of duties at the time he responded to an emergency bulletin. Duncan v. Town of Jackson, 903 P.2d 548,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1995).

Review of noncompliant pleading.—

Although a movant did not file a petition for writ of mandamus in the name of the State of Wyoming, on relation of the party applying, or verify it by affidavit, because the movant may have been allowed to amend the movant's claim to meet the requirements and the district court resolved the action on the merits, the appellate court, in the interests of finality and judicial economy, addressed whether the movant was entitled to the relief which the movant requested. Williams v. Sundstrom, 2016 WY 122, 385 P.3d 789,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 2016).

Applied in

Williams v. Tharp, 2017 WY 8, 388 P.3d 513,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 2017).

§ 1-30-104.
Writ not to be issued if adequate remedy at law; party beneficially
interested.

The writ must not be
issued when there is an adequate remedy at law. It may issue on the
information of the party beneficially interested.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 728; R.S. 1887, § 3076; R.S. 1899, § 4197; C.S. 1910, § 5057; C.S. 1920, § 6319; R.S. 1931, § 89-4504; C.S. 1945, § 3-6704; W.S. 1957, § 1-880; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-31-104

.

Failure to exhaust administrative remedies forecloses mandamus.
—

Failure to pursue administrative relief and exhaust administrative remedies in accordance with a zoning ordinance forecloses the remedy of mandamus. State ex rel. Epp v. Mayor, 894 P.2d 590,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo. 1995).

Administrative remedy is not adequate remedy at law. —

The reference in this section to a plain and adequate remedy “in the ordinary course of the law” comprehends more than the “administrative remedy” provided under §

41-3-603

for reviewing decisions of water commissioners. Le Beau v. State, 377 P.2d 302,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1963).

But the right of appeal is a plain, speedy and adequate remedy at law.

Le Beau v. State, 377 P.2d 302,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1963); Wyoming Bd. of Equalization v. State, 637 P.2d 248,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 396

(Wyo. 1981).

Thus, mandamus cannot substitute for appeal. —

In the absence of good reason therefor mandamus cannot be resorted to as a substitute for an appeal. Le Beau v. State, 377 P.2d 302,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1963).

Mandamus cannot be made to serve the purpose of an ordinary suit.

State ex rel. Whitehead v. Gage, 377 P.2d 299,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 1963); Le Beau v. State, 377 P.2d 302,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1963); State ex rel. Badley v. Sheridan, 513 P.2d 647,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1973).

Remedy by appeal. —

Where applicant for mineral lease had adequate remedy by appeal from contest proceeding, mandamus against board of land commissioners will not lie. State ex rel. Walls v. State Bd. of Land Comm'rs, 36 Wyo. 302, 254 P. 491,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1927).

Relator's right must be clear and certain. —

To warrant the issuance of mandamus not only must there be a legal right in the relator but owing to the extraordinary and drastic character of mandamus and the caution exercised by courts in awarding it, it is also important that the right sought to be enforced be clear and certain so as not to admit of any reasonable controversy. Le Beau v. State, 377 P.2d 302,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1963).

Writ of mandamus will issue only where the duty to perform is clear, certain and undisputable. State ex rel. Badley v. Sheridan, 513 P.2d 647,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1973).

The law must not only authorize the demanded action but require it

for mandamus to issue. State ex rel. Badley v. Sheridan, 513 P.2d 647,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1973); Wyoming Bd. of Equalization v. State, 637 P.2d 248,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 396

(Wyo. 1981).

Mandamus does not lie to determine if water was illegally impounded.
—

Mandamus is not the proper remedy for determining whether water has been illegally impounded by a water commissioner. The issues involved should not be disposed of in mandamus proceedings, but by appeal under former § 41-63, which provides for an appeal to the district court, or by an appropriate legal or equitable action. Le Beau v. State, 377 P.2d 302,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1963).

Action on certificate of indebtedness. —

Where county commissioners claim to have a defense against a claim based on certificates of indebtedness, mandamus against treasurer is not the remedy, as action against county based on certificate is a plain, speedy and adequate remedy. State ex rel. Robertson Inv. Co. v. Patterson, 47 Wyo. 416, 38 P.2d 617,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1934).

Mandamus for tax receipt. —

Contention that mandamus would not lie to compel issuance of the receipt in that the taxpayers could bring an action to quiet title was without merit, since, even if they were in possession, quieting of title would not give them the receipt to which they were entitled, and hence the remedy was neither specific nor adequate. Lobban v. State, 9 Wyo. 377, 64 P. 82,

1901 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1901).

Under this section, where purchasers at mortgage sale liquidated taxes which were assessed against the mortgagor and a lien on the land, and county treasurer wrongfully refused to give receipt in full on ground that a personalty tax against mortgagor was a lien superior to the mortgage, contention that mandamus did not lie to compel giving of such receipt because the priority of liens could have been determined in the foreclosure suit was without merit, since statute not only permits foreclosure by advertisement, but taxpayers were not mortgagees. Lobban v. State, 9 Wyo. 377, 64 P. 82,

1901 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1901).

Tax shortfall grants. —

Mandamus was not the proper remedy for determining whether tax shortfall grants authorized for school districts were required by statute to be included as local resources in the year in which they were paid; the districts were not entitled to the writ without a showing they had no plain and adequate remedy at law, and there was no such showing. Britton v. Halliburton Servs., 895 P.2d 45,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 1995).

Right to office. —

Mandamus is not the proper remedy to try title to office between contending parties. State ex rel. Hamilton v. Grant, 14 Wyo. 41, 81 P. 795,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 14 Wyo. 41, 81 P. 795,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1905).

Judgment annulling election in which unqualified candidate's
name appeared on ballot appropriate remedy. —

The district court correctly ruled that a candidate, who had been convicted of a felony in another state and who had not had his rights restored in Wyoming, was unqualified to run for county commissioner. The fact that Wyoming might have treated the candidate's conviction as a misdemeanor had it occurred here, and that the candidate did not lose his civil rights in the state of conviction, did not alter this outcome. However, the court erred in issuing a writ of mandamus directing the holding of a special election, as a judgment annulling the election in which the unqualified candidate's name appeared on the ballot was the appropriate remedy. Mills v. Campbell County Canvassing Bd., 707 P.2d 747,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 588

(Wyo. 1985).

Right to salary. —

After the alleged unlawful removal of one from a public office and the appointment and qualification of his successor, the former claiming to still hold the office may have his right to the salary thereof determined on mandamus to compel the proper officer to issue a warrant to him for the salary alleged to be due, though as incidental to the determination of that matter it may be necessary to decide upon the legality of the removal of relator. State ex rel. Hamilton v. Grant, 14 Wyo. 41, 81 P. 795,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 14 Wyo. 41, 81 P. 795,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1905).

Mandamus was a proper remedy to compel an irrigation district to supply water,

where there had been a persistent and willful avoidance by the district of its contractual duty and an ordinary action at law followed by an appeal would have been an inadequate remedy. State ex rel. Squaw Mountain Cattle Co. v. Wheatland Irrigation Dist., 728 P.2d 172,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 639

(Wyo. 1986).

Applied

in

Basin Elec. Power Coop. v. Bowen, 979 P.2d 503,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1999).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Jeffrey v. Burdick, 3 Wyo. 588, 28 P. 146,

1891 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(1891); Wyoming Coal Mining Co. v. State ex rel. Kennedy, 15 Wyo. 97, 87 P. 337,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(1906).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Adequacy of remedy at law for refusal of corporation or its agent to register or effectuate transfer of stock, 22 ALR2d 12.

Remedy by appeal or writ of error as affecting mandamus to enforce right to jury trial, 41 ALR2d 780.

Mandamus to compel assertedly disqualified judge to recuse self or to certify his disqualification, 45 ALR2d 937, 56 ALR Fed 494.

Right of parents to mandamus against school officials with respect to names of children, 53 ALR2d 914.

Mandamus to compel admission to membership in professional associations, 89 ALR2d 964.

§ 1-30-105.
Writ to be peremptory if right is clear; alternative writ to issue
in other cases.

When the right to require
the performance of the act is clear and it is apparent that no valid
excuse can be given for not performing it, a court may allow a peremptory
mandamus. In all other cases an alternative writ must first be issued
on the allowance of the court, or a judge thereof.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 729; R.S. 1887, § 3077; R.S. 1899, § 4198; C.S. 1910, § 5058; C.S. 1920, § 6320; R.S. 1931, § 89-4505; C.S. 1945, § 3-6705; W.S. 1957, § 1-881; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-31-105

.

Cited in

Williams v. Sundstrom, 2016 WY 122, 385 P.3d 789,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 2016).

Supreme court's jurisdiction. —

Under art. 5, § 3, Wyo. Const., and this section, statute, insofar as it authorizes a single judge of the supreme court in vacation to allow issuance of alternative writ of mandamus, is not repugnant to the constitution, since it merely provides a method of procedure to set in motion the original jurisdiction of such court in mandamus to state officers, and such allowance is not inhibited by the constitution. State ex rel. Bennett v. Barber, 4 Wyo. 56, 32 P. 14,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1892).

Writ of mandamus should only issue where duty to perform is clear,

certain and undisputable. Wyoming Bd. of Equalization v. State, 637 P.2d 248,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 396

(Wyo. 1981).

Failure to exhaust administrative remedies forecloses mandamus.
—

Failure to pursue administrative relief and exhaust administrative remedies in accordance with a zoning ordinance forecloses the remedy of mandamus. State ex rel. Epp v. Mayor, 894 P.2d 590,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo. 1995).

§ 1-30-106.
Docket entry of allowance of writ.

The allowance of a peremptory
writ ordering the defendant to do the act required immediately upon
service, or an alternative writ ordering that he do the act or show
cause before the court at a specified time and place why he does not
do the act, shall be entered upon the docket.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 730; R.S. 1887, § 3078; R.S. 1899, § 4199; C.S. 1910, § 5059; C.S. 1920, § 6321; R.S. 1931, § 89-4506; C.S. 1945, § 3-6706; W.S. 1957, § 1-882; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-31-106

.

Cited in

Williams v. Sundstrom, 2016 WY 122, 385 P.3d 789,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 2016).

§ 1-30-107.
Issuance and service of writ.

The writ shall be issued
by the clerk of the court in which the application is made and shall
contain a copy of the petition, verification and order of allowance.
A copy shall be served upon the defendant personally, by the sheriff
of the proper county or by a person specially authorized by the court
or judge. The officer or person shall report his proceedings to the
court, and if the service is made by a person not an officer, the
return must be verified by his affidavit.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 731; R.S. 1887, § 3079; R.S. 1899, § 4200; C.S. 1910, § 5060; C.S. 1920, § 6322; R.S. 1931, § 89-4507; C.S. 1945, § 3-6707; W.S. 1957, § 1-883; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-31-107

.

Cited

in

State ex rel. Feeney v. District Court, 607 P.2d 1259,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 247

(1980).

§ 1-30-108.
Defendant may answer.

On the return day of
an alternative writ or such other day as the court may allow, the
defendant may answer as in a civil action.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 732; R.S. 1887, § 3080; R.S. 1899, § 4201; C.S. 1910, § 5061; C.S. 1920, § 6323; R.S. 1931, § 89-4508; C.S. 1945, § 3-6708; W.S. 1957, § 1-884; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-31-108

.

§ 1-30-109.
Judgment on default.

If no answer is made,
a peremptory mandamus shall be allowed against the defendant.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 734; R.S. 1887, § 3082; R.S. 1899, § 4203; C.S. 1910, § 5063; C.S. 1920, § 6325; R.S. 1931, § 89-4510; C.S. 1945, § 3-6710; W.S. 1957, § 1-886; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-31-109

.

§ 1-30-110.
Effect and construction of pleadings.

The pleadings shall have
the same effect and be construed and amended as in civil actions.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 735; R.S. 1887, § 3083; R.S. 1899, § 4204; C.S. 1910, § 5064; C.S. 1920, § 6326; R.S. 1931, § 89-4511; C.S. 1945, § 3-6711; W.S. 1957, § 1-887; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-31-110

.

Allegation of presumed facts. —

It is not necessary to allege and show affirmatively matters of fact which the law presumes from other facts which are alleged. State ex rel. Bennett v. Barber, 4 Wyo. 56, 32 P. 14,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1892).

Prima facie case. —

It is only necessary that petition make out a prima facie case entitling aggrieved party to the extraordinary aid of the court. Appel v. State, 9 Wyo. 187, 61 P. 1015,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1900).

§ 1-30-111.
Issues of fact; trial.

Issues of fact made by
the pleadings shall be tried and further proceedings had thereon the
same as in civil actions.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 736; R.S. 1887, § 3084; R.S. 1899, § 4205; C.S. 1910, § 5065; C.S. 1920, § 6327; R.S. 1931, § 89-4512; C.S. 1945, § 3-6712; W.S. 1957, § 1-888; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-31-111

.

§ 1-30-112.
Judgment for plaintiff; damages.

If judgment is for the
relator, he may recover damages as ascertained by the court, a jury
or by a referee or master as in a civil action, plus costs. A peremptory
mandamus shall also be granted to him without delay.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 737; R.S. 1887, § 3085; R.S. 1899, § 4206; C.S. 1910, § 5066; C.S. 1920, § 6328; R.S. 1931, § 89-4513; C.S. 1945, § 3-6713; W.S. 1957, § 1-889; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-31-112

.

Cross references. —

As to costs generally, see chapter 14 of this title.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Allowance of damages to successful plaintiff or relator in mandamus, 73 ALR2d 903.

Allowance of attorneys' fees in mandamus proceedings, 34 ALR4th 457.

§ 1-30-113.
Recovery a bar to other actions.

A recovery of damages
against a defendant shall bar any other action upon that cause of
action.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 738; R.S. 1887, § 3086; R.S. 1899, § 4207; C.S. 1910, § 5067; C.S. 1920, § 6329; R.S. 1931, § 89-4514; C.S. 1945, § 3-6714; W.S. 1957, § 1-890; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-31-113

.

§ 1-30-114.
Costs against relator.

If judgment is given
for the defendant, all costs shall be adjudged against the relator.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 739; R.S. 1887, § 3087; R.S. 1899, § 4208; C.S. 1910, § 5068; C.S. 1920, § 6330; R.S. 1931, § 89-4515; C.S. 1945, § 3-6715; W.S. 1957, § 1-891; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-31-114

.

Cross references. —

As to costs generally, see chapter 14 of this title.

Mandatory section. —

This section is mandatory. State ex rel. Sampson v. Sheridan, 25 Wyo. 347, 170 P. 1,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1918).

§ 1-30-115.
Penalty for failure to comply with mandamus.

When a peremptory mandamus
is directed to a public officer, body or board commanding the performance
of a public duty specially enjoined by law, and the court finds that
the officer or any member of a body or board has, without just excuse,
refused or neglected to perform the duty enjoined, the court may impose
a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500.00) on the officer
or member. Payment of the fine shall bar an action for any penalty
incurred by the officer or member by reason of his refusal or neglect.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 740; R.S. 1899, § 4209; C.S. 1910, § 5069; C.S. 1920, § 6331; R.S. 1931, § 89-4516; C.S. 1945, § 3-6716; W.S. 1957, § 1-892; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-31-115

.

§ 1-30-116.
County treasurer to levy and assess tax upon mandamus.

When a peremptory mandamus
is issued against the commissioners of a county, the trustees of a
school district or the officers of a municipal corporation to levy
and assess a tax to pay interest upon a debt or to create a sinking
fund for the payment of a funded debt, and the officers have resigned,
or refuse or neglect to levy and assess the tax, or their offices
are vacant, upon motion of an interested person, the court may issue
a special order to the county treasurer of the proper county commanding
him to levy and assess the taxes required by law and to place the
same upon the tax list for collection by the county treasurer.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 741; R.S. 1887, § 3089; R.S. 1899, § 4210; C.S. 1910, § 5070; C.S. 1920, § 6332; R.S. 1931, § 89-4517; C.S. 1945, § 3-6717; W.S. 1957, § 1-893; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-31-116

.

§ 1-30-117.
County treasurer to levy and assess tax upon mandamus; duties and
fees of treasurer.

When a special order
is issued to the county treasurer he is responsible for its execution
in the same manner as if he were an officer of the court. He shall
receive such fees for his services in executing the order, if not
otherwise fixed by the court, as are allowed by law for making tax
duplicates. The fees and all other costs of the proceedings shall
be added to the taxes levied in executing the order, and placed upon
the duplicate for collection with the taxes.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 742; R.S. 1887, § 3090; R.S. 1899, § 4211; C.S. 1910, § 5071; C.S. 1920, § 6333; R.S. 1931, § 89-4518; C.S. 1945, § 3-6718; W.S. 1957, § 1-894; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-31-117

.

Cross references. —

As to costs generally, see chapter 14 of this title.

§ 1-30-118.
County treasurer to levy and assess tax upon mandamus; powers of
court.

The provisions of W.S.

1-30-116

and

1-30-117

shall not be construed to limit the power of the court
to carry its order and judgment into execution or to punish any officer
named therein for contempt or disobedience of its orders or writs.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 743; R.S. 1887, § 3091; R.S. 1899, § 4212; C.S. 1910, § 5072; C.S. 1920, § 6334; R.S. 1931, § 89-4519; C.S. 1945, § 3-6719; W.S. 1957, § 1-895; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-31-118

.